North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-11 Pretrial Conferences [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 16]

28-11-01.
Power of court to direct conference. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 16.

28-11-02.
Court to make order after conference. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 16.

28-11-03.
Petition for conference. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 16.

28-11-04.
Authority of judge at conference. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 12, 16.